Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1873.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4304(a)(1) and (2) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 4304. Endangering welfare of children.(a) Offense defined.--(1) [A] Except as provided in subsection (a.1), a parent, guardian or other person supervising the welfare of a child under 18 years of age, or a person that employs or supervises such a person, commits an offense if he knowingly endangers the welfare of the child by violating a duty of 1234567891011121314151617181920 care, protection or support.(2) [A] Except as provided in subsection (a.1), a person commits an offense if the person, in an official capacity, prevents or interferes with the making of a report of suspected child abuse under 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to child protective services).* * *(a.1) Exceptions.--It shall not be considered an offense under subsection (a) if:(1) the conduct does not constitute abuse as defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6102 (relating to definitions); or(2) the child is not a dependent child as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 6302 (relating to definitions).* * *Section 2. The definition of "serious physical neglect" in section 6303(a) of Title 23 is amended to read:§ 6303. Definitions.(a) General rule.--The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Serious physical neglect." Any of the following when committed by a perpetrator that endangers a child's life or health, threatens a child's well-being, causes bodily injury or impairs a child's health, development or functioning:(1) A repeated, prolonged or egregious failure to supervise a child in a manner that is [appropriate] necessary considering the child's developmental age and abilities.(2) The deliberate failure to provide a child with [adequate] essentials of life, including food, shelter or 20250HB1873PN2618 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 medical care.* * *Section 3. Section 6304 of Title 23 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6304. Exclusions from child abuse.* * *(d.1) Supervision and independent activities.--(1) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict the rights of a parent to determine the level of supervision given to a child in a manner that is appropriate considering the child's development and abilities.(2) A parent may permit a child of sufficient maturity to engage in independent activities, including:(i) Traveling to and from school, including walking, running or bicycling.(ii) Tr aveling to and from nearby commercial or recreational facilities.(iii) Engaging in outdoor play.(iv) Notwithstanding 75 Pa.C.S. § 3701.1 (relating to leaving an unattended child in a motor vehicle), remaining in a vehicle unattended.(v) Remaining at home or in a location unattended.(vi) Providing care for younger siblings or family members.(vii) Engaging in a similar independent activity.(3) A decision by a parent relating to supervision or independent activities of a child under paragraph (2) shall not constitute serious physical neglect, child abuse as defined under section 6303 (relating to definitions) or an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4304 (relating to endangering 20250HB1873PN2618 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 welfare of children), unless the parent willfully or recklessly disregards an obvious A FORESEEABLE danger to the child for which a reasonable and prudent parent would take precautionary measures to prevent subjecting the child to an unreasonable risk of serious harm.* * *Section 4. Paragraph (1) of the definition of "dependent child" in section 6302 of Title 42 is amended to read:§ 6302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Dependent child." A child who:(1) is without [proper] parental care or control, subsistence, education as required by law, or other care or control necessary for his physical, mental, or emotional health[, or morals]. A determination that there is a lack of [proper] parental care or control [may] shall be based upon evidence of conduct by the parent, guardian or other custodian that places the health, safety or welfare of the child at [risk,] serious and likely risk of harm, including evidence of the parent's, guardian's or other custodian's use of alcohol or a controlled substance that places the health, safety or welfare of the child at [risk;] serious and likely risk of harm, but this paragraph shall not be construed to restrict the rights of a parent to determine the level of supervision given to a child in a manner that is appropriate considering the child's development and abilities;* * *20250HB1873PN2618 - 4 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 5. All regulations and parts of regulations are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with this act.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1873PN2618 - 5 - 123